Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-644
Counterfeit airbags; violations; penalties.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a violation of the Counterfeit Airbag Prevention Act is a Class IV felony.

(2) A violation of the act is a Class IIIA felony if the defendant has been previously convicted of a violation of the act.

(3) A violation of the act is a Class III felony if the violation resulted in an individual suffering bodily injury.

(4) A violation of the act is a Class IIA felony if the violation resulted in an individual suffering serious bodily injury.

(5) A violation of the act is a Class II felony if the violation resulted in the death of an individual.

Laws 2019, LB7, § 5.